Utah statutes.
16-6a-112.   Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

One or more of the following is conclusive evidence that the original document has been filed with the division:

(1)  a certificate attached to a copy of a document filed by the division; or

(2)  an endorsement, seal, or stamp placed on the copy by the division.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

